Louisiana, session 2026, HB83.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3973(2)(b)(ii) through (iv) and 3983(C) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§3973. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) Charter schools shall be one of the following types:
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 83
(ii) Type 2, which means a new school or a preexisting public school
converted and operated as the result of and pursuant to a charter between the
nonprofit corporation created to operate the school and the State Board of
Elementary and Secondary Education. Prior to the creation of such a charter to
convert a preexisting school, it shall be approved by the professional members of the
faculty and staff of the preexisting school as provided in R.S. 17:3983(C) and by the
parents or guardians of children enrolled in the school as provided in R.S.
17:3983(C). Within such Type 2 charter schools, pupils who reside within the state
will be eligible to attend as provided in the charter. Creation of a Type 2 charter
school shall comply with the provisions of R.S. 17:3983(A)(2)(a)(i).
(iii) Type 3, which means a preexisting public school converted and operated
as the result of and pursuant to a charter between a nonprofit corporation and the
local school board. Prior to the creation of such a charter, the local school board may
require approval of a proposal to create such a charter by the members of the faculty
and staff of the preexisting school who are certified by the state board as provided
in R.S. 17:3983(C) and by the parents or guardians of children enrolled in the school
as provided in R.S. 17:3983(C). Within such Type 3 schools, only pupils who would
be eligible to attend a public school operated by the local school board granting the
charter, or pupils from the same area as those permitted to attend the preexisting
school will be eligible to attend as provided in the charter.
(iv) Type 4, which means a preexisting public school converted and operated
or a new school operated as the result of and pursuant to a charter between a local
school board and the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education. Prior to
the creation of such a charter to convert a preexisting school, the state board may
require approval of a proposal to create such a charter by the professional members
of the faculty and staff of the preexisting school as provided in R.S. 17:3983(C) and
by the parents or guardians of children enrolled in the school as provided in R.S.
17:3983(C). Within such Type 4 schools, unless an agreement with another city,
parish, or other local public school board is reached to allow students to attend the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 83
charter school, only pupils who would be eligible to attend a public school operated
by the local school board or pupils from the same areas as those permitted to attend
the preexisting school will be eligible to attend as provided in the charter.
* * *
§3983. Chartering process by type; eligibility; limitations; faculty approval; parental
approval
* * *
C.(1)(a)(i) Approval by members of the faculty and staff who are certified
by the state board of a preexisting school proposed to be converted to a charter
school requires a favorable vote of the a simple majority of the eligible members of
such the faculty and staff, voting together each with one vote, at the preexisting
school voting at an election held for such purpose. The number needed for approval
shall be determined by the number of eligible employees assigned to such school on
October first preceding the election.
(ii) The election shall be held by secret ballot.
(iii) A member of the faculty and staff is eligible to vote if he is certified by
the state board, is employed by or assigned to the school on the date of the election,
and has been employed by or assigned to the school since the first of October that
immediately precedes the election.
(iv) Each eligible member of the faculty and staff may cast only one vote.
(b) Such an election may be repeated in any school for approval of the same
or a different charter proposal; however, such an election may occur no more often
than once in any school year.
(2)(a) Approval by the parents or guardians of pupils attending a preexisting
school proposed to be converted to a charter school requires a favorable vote of the
a simple majority of the eligible parents or guardians of pupils enrolled in the school
at the time of the election who are voting, provided the number of votes cast equals
at least fifty percent of the number of pupils voting at an election held for such
purpose.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 83
(b) The election shall be held by secret ballot. There shall be one vote for
each pupil enrolled in the school which may be cast by one parent or guardian for
each pupil.
(c)(i) To be eligible to vote, a parent or guardian shall be the parent or
guardian of at least one child who is enrolled in the school on the date of the election.
(ii) Only one parent or guardian of each student shall be eligible to vote, and
if he is the parent or guardian of more than one student enrolled in the school, he
may cast an additional vote for each such student.
(3) The state board shall adopt rules for the purposes of implementing the
provisions of this Subsection and providing for a fair and transparent election
process, including but not limited to providing for ways to protect the anonymity of
voters. Any election held for the purposes of this Subsection for the conversion of
a preexisting school into a charter school shall be conducted in accordance with these
rules.
* * *